Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 14 Fraudulent Transfers

Cross references. —

As to limitation of action for relief on ground of fraud, see §§

1-3-105

and

1-3-106

.

As to survival of causes of action for any deceit or fraud, see §

1-4-101

.

As to disposal of mortgaged property with intent to deprive mortgagee of security, see §

6-3-607

et seq.

As to fraudulent conveyances to defeat or establish petition with reference to the formation of drainage districts, see §

41-9-115

.

Applied

in

Thomasi v. Koch, 660 P.2d 806,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Business Corporation Act: Is it Time for Change?” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 523 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

9C Am. Jur. 2d Bankruptcy §§ 2019 to 2139; 37 Am. Jur. 2d Fraudulent Conveyances § 1 et seq.

Right of creditor to set aside transfer of property as fraudulent as affected by the fact that his claim is barred by statute of limitations, 14 ALR2d 598.

Rule denying relief to one who conveyed his property to defraud his creditors as applicable where the threatened claim which occasioned the conveyance was paid or was never established, 21 ALR2d 589, 6 ALR4th 862.

Transaction in consideration of discharge of antecedent debt owed by one other than grantor as based on “fair consideration” under Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, 30 ALR2d 1209.

Right of creditors to attack as fraudulent conveyance by third person to debtor's spouse, 35 ALR2d 8.

Conveyance or transfer in consideration of legal services, rendered or to be rendered, as fraudulent as against creditors, 45 ALR2d 500.

Accountability and liability for rents and profits of grantee of fraudulently conveyed real property, 60 ALR2d 593.

Accountability of grantee for rents and profits of fraudulently conveyed real property as subject to creditors for expenditures for taxes, improvements, and the like, 60 ALR2d 593.

Tort claimant's right, prior to judgment, to attack conveyance or transfer as fraudulent, 73 ALR2d 749.

When statute of limitation or laches commences to run against action to set aside fraudulent conveyance or transfer in fraud of creditors, 100 ALR2d 1094.

Conveyance as fraudulent where made in contemplation of possible liability for future tort, 38 ALR3d 597.

Rule denying recovery of property to one who conveyed to defraud creditors as applicable where the claim which motivated the conveyance was never established, 6 ALR4th 862.

Right of secured creditor to have set aside fraudulent transfer of other property by his debtor, 8 ALR4th 1123.

Recovery of punitive damages in action by purchasers of real property charging fraud or misrepresentation, 19 ALR4th 801.

Attorneys' fees as recoverable in fraud action, 44 ALR4th 776.

37 C.J.S. Fraudulent Conveyances § 1 et seq.